District of Columbia statutes.
8-103.12

Mayor authorized to issue research grants.

The Mayor may issue grants for research concerning the quality of the District waters to universities and institutions.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-188, § 13, 32 DCR 919
1981 Ed., § 6-932.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-188, see Mayor’s Order 87-278, December 11, 1987.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 5-188, the “Water Pollution Control Act of 1984”, see Mayor’s Order 98-50, April 15, 1998 ( 45 DCR 2696).
Extension of authority: The authority of the Mayor to issue grants under this section was extended to both the Department of Regulatory Affairs and the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1987, effective July 3, 1987.